Hawaii statutes.
[§125C-6] Petition for adoption, amendment,
repeal, or suspension of rules. Any interested person may petition the
governor or the governor's authorized representative requesting the adoption,
amendment, repeal, or suspension of any rule and stating reasons therefor. The
governor or the governor's authorized representative shall prescribe the form
for the petitions and the procedures for their submission, consideration, and
disposition, and within thirty days after submission of the petition shall either
deny the petition in writing, stating the governor's or the governor's
authorized representative's reasons for the denial, or grant the petition and
adopt, amend, repeal, or suspend the rule accordingly. [L 1975, c 38, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next